California statutes. Labor Code
Liability for compensation does not attach to any employer of a person excluded by paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 3352 from the definition of “employee” for an injury to or the death of a person so excluded which occurs on or after the effective date of this section if the employer elected to come under the compensation provisions of this division pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4151 prior to the effective date of this section by purchasing or renewing a policy providing comprehensive personal liability insurance containing a provision for coverage against liability for the payment of compensation, as defined in Section 3207 of the Labor Code, to any person defined as an employee by subdivision (d) of Section 3351 of the Labor Code, however, this section does not prohibit an employer from
 providing compensation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 770, Sec. 7.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4157.

Where any employer has made an election pursuant to this chapter to include under the compensation provisions of this division an independent contractor engaged in vending, selling, offering for sale, or delivering directly to the public any newspaper, magazine, or periodical, the status of such person as an independent contractor for all other purposes shall not be affected by such election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 672.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Economic Opportunity Programs [4201. - 4229.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4201. - 4209.]

4201.

It is the intent of this chapter to apply to all enrollees in economic opportunity programs, including, but not limited to, work training or work study authorized by or financed in whole or in part through provisions of Public Law 88-452 (Economic Opportunity Act of 1964).

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4202.

“Economic Opportunity Program” means any program adopted pursuant to Public Law 88-452, including, but not limited to, work training and work study.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4203.

“Enrollee” means any person enrolled in an economic opportunity program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4204.

“Sponsoring agency” means any agency, entity, or institution, public or private, receiving grants or financial assistance, either directly or as a subcontractor, pursuant to Public Law 88-452.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4205.

“Participating agency” means any agency, entity or institution, public or private, taking part in an economic opportunity program, other than a sponsoring agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4206.

Except as provided in this chapter, an enrollee within a given economic opportunity program shall have no right to receive compensation from sponsoring or participating agencies, entities, and institutions, public or private.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4207.

Compensation shall be furnished an enrollee for injury or to dependents if injury causes death, suffered within or without the state occurring in the course of his duties for a sponsoring agency within an economic opportunity program if the following conditions occur:

(a) Where, at the time of injury, the enrollee is performing services and is acting within the scope of his duties as a recipient of aid within an economic opportunity program.

(b) Where injury is proximately caused by his service as an enrollee within an economic opportunity program either with or without negligence.

(c) Where injury is not caused by the intoxication of the injured enrollee.

(d) Where the injury is not intentionally self-inflicted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4208.

Where the conditions of compensation exist, the right to recover such compensation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is the exclusive remedy for injury or death of an enrollee against the sponsoring agency, or the participating agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4209.

Insofar as not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, all of the provisions of this division shall pertain to enrollees and their dependents and the furnishing of compensation benefits thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits [4211. - 4214.]

4211.

Where liability for compensation exists, such compensation shall be provided as limited by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4212.

If an enrollee suffers injury or death in the performance of his duties under an economic opportunity program, then, irrespective of his remuneration from this or other employment, his average weekly earnings for the purpose of determining temporary and permanent disability indemnity shall be determined in accordance with Section 4453, provided that for the purpose of this chapter only, there shall be no statutory minimum average weekly earnings for temporary disability indemnity. If the injury sustained by an enrollee causes death, death benefits shall be determined in accordance with Sections 4701 and 4702 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4213.

If the injury sustained by an enrollee causes permanent disability, the percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined for the occupation of a laborer of like age by applying the schedule for the determination of the percentage of permanent disabilities prepared and adopted by the appeals board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1364.)
-------------------------------------------

4214.

In addition to death benefit in the event of fatal injury, the reasonable expenses of the enrollee’s burial shall be paid not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600).

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Adjustment of Claims [4226. - 4229.]

4226.

Should the United States government or any agent thereof, pursuant to federal statute, rule or regulations furnish benefits to enrollees or dependents of enrollees under an economic opportunity program, then the amount of indemnity which an enrollee or his dependents are entitled to receive under this chapter shall be reduced by the amount of monetary benefits the enrollee or his dependents have and will receive from the above source as a result of injury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4227.

If the United States government or any agent thereof furnishes medical treatment to an injured enrollee, the enrollee will have no right to receive the same or similar treatment under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4228.

If the furnishing of medical treatment by the United States government or its agent takes the form of reimbursement of the enrollee, he shall have no right to receive the same or similar treatment under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------

4229.

If the furnishing of compensation benefits to an enrollee or his dependents under this chapter prevents such enrollee or his dependents from receiving benefits under the provisions of federal statute, rule or regulations, then the enrollee or his dependents shall have no right and shall not receive compensation benefits under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1685.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Disaster Service Workers [4350. - 4355.]

4350.

The Office of Emergency Services shall administer this chapter as it relates to volunteer disaster service workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 401.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

4351.

Compensation provided by this division is the exclusive remedy of a disaster service worker, or his or her dependents, for injury or death arising out of, and in the course of, his or her activities as a disaster service worker as against the state, the disaster council with which he or she is registered, and the county or city which has empowered the disaster council to register and direct his or her activities. Liability for compensation provided by this division is in lieu of any other liability whatsoever to a disaster service worker or his or her dependents or any other person on his or her behalf against the state, the disaster council with which the disaster service worker is registered, and the county or city which has empowered the disaster council to register and direct his or her activities, for any injury or death arising out of, and in the course of, his or her activities as a disaster service worker.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4352.

(a) No compensation shall be paid or furnished to a disaster service worker or a dependent of a disaster service worker pursuant to this division absent an initial appropriation of funds for the purpose of furnishing compensation to a disaster service worker or a dependent of a disaster service worker. Liability for the initial payment or furnishing of compensation is dependent upon and limited to the availability of money so appropriated.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when appropriated funds are temporarily unavailable for disbursement, the State Compensation Insurance Fund may provide compensation to an eligible claimant under this section whose injuries have previously either been accepted or found to be compensable by the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board.

(1) Compensation to, and benefits for, an eligible claimant provided for under this subdivision may include the issuance of checks by the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(2) Within 30 days of the date funds that had been temporarily unavailable are appropriated, and therefore become available, the California Emergency Management Agency shall reimburse the State Compensation Insurance Fund for compensation paid to, or benefits paid for, a claimant pursuant to paragraph (1), in addition to any applicable interest, service fees, or charges.

(c) After all money appropriated as described in subdivision (a) is expended or set aside in bookkeeping reserves for the payment or furnishing of compensation and reimbursing the State Compensation Insurance Fund for its services, the payment or furnishing of compensation for an injury to a disaster service worker or his or her dependents is dependent upon there having been a reserve set up for the payment or furnishing of compensation to that disaster service worker or his or her dependents and for that injury, and liability is limited to the amount of the reserve. The excess in a reserve for the payment or furnishing of compensation or for reimbursing the State Compensation Insurance Fund for its compensation payments and services may be transferred to reserves of other disaster service workers for the payment or furnishing of compensation and reimbursing the State Compensation Insurance Fund, or may be used to set up reserves for other disaster service workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 25.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4353.

If a disaster service worker suffers injury or death while in the performance of duties as a disaster service worker, then, irrespective of his or her remuneration from this or other employment or from both, the average weekly earnings for the purposes of determining temporary and permanent disability indemnity shall be taken at the maximum fixed for each, respectively, in Section 4453.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4354.

If the injury sustained by a disaster service worker causes permanent disability, the percentage of disability to total disability shall be determined as for the occupation of a laborer of like age by applying the schedule for the determination of the percentages of permanent disabilities prepared and adopted by the administrative director. The amount of the weekly payment for permanent disability shall be the same as the weekly benefit which would be paid for temporary total disability pursuant to Section 4353.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4355.

(a) Should the United States Government or any agent thereof, in accordance with any federal statute, rule, or regulation, furnish monetary assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief to disaster service workers or to disaster service workers and their dependents for injuries arising out of and occurring in the course of their activities as disaster service workers, the amount of compensation that any disaster service worker or his or her dependents are otherwise entitled to receive from the State of California under this division for any injury shall be reduced by the amount of monetary assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief the disaster service worker or his or her dependents have received and will receive from the United States or any agent thereof as a result of the injury.

(b) If, in addition to monetary assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief, the United States Government or any agent thereof furnishes medical, surgical, or hospital treatment, or any combination thereof, to an injured disaster service worker, the disaster service worker has no right to receive similar medical, surgical, or hospital treatment under this division.

(c) If, in addition to monetary assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief, the United States Government or any agent thereof will reimburse a disaster service worker or his or her dependents for medical, surgical, or hospital treatment, or any combination thereof, furnished to the injured disaster service worker, the disaster service worker has no right to receive similar medical, surgical, or hospital treatment under this division.

(d) If the furnishing of compensation under this division to a disaster service worker or his or her dependents prevents the disaster service worker or his or her dependents from receiving assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief under a federal statute, rule, regulation, the disaster service worker and his or her dependents shall have no right to, and may not receive, any compensation from the State of California under this division for any injury for which the United States Government or any agent thereof will furnish assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief in the absence of the furnishing of compensation by the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 228, Sec. 34.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Asbestos Workers’ Account [4401. - 4418.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4401. - 4406.]

4401.

It is the declared policy of the state that qualified injured workers with asbestosis which arises out of and occurs in the course of employment shall receive workers’ compensation asbestos workers’ benefits promptly and not be subjected to delays of litigation to determine the responsible employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 1.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4402.

(a) “Asbestosis” means any pathology, whether or not combined with preexisting pathology, which results in disability or need for medical treatment from inhalation of asbestos fibers.

(b) “Asbestos worker” means any person whose occupation subjected him or her to an exposure to asbestos fibers.

(c) “Asbestos workers’ benefits” means temporary total disability benefits, permanent total disability benefits, death benefits, and medical benefits.

(d) “Dependents” means, and is limited to, a surviving spouse who at the time of injury was dependent on the deceased asbestos worker for half or more of his or her support, and minor children of the deceased asbestos worker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4403.

The Asbestos Workers’ Account is hereby created in the Uninsured Employers Fund in the State Treasury, and shall be administered by the Director of Industrial Relations. The money in the Asbestos Workers’ Account is hereby continuously appropriated for the purposes of this chapter, and to pay the expenses of the director in administering these provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4404.

Insofar as not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, all of the provisions of this division shall pertain to asbestos workers and their dependents for purposes of furnishing workers’ compensation asbestos workers’ benefits thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 2.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4405.

Where the conditions of compensation exist under this division the right to recover workers’ compensation asbestos workers’ benefits pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is a temporary remedy for injury to an asbestos worker against the Asbestos Workers’ Account, and such asbestos worker or his or her dependents shall make all reasonable effort to establish the identity of the employer responsible for securing the payment of compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 3.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4406.

(a) Payments as advances on workers’ compensation asbestos workers’ benefits shall be furnished an asbestos worker for injury resulting in asbestosis, or the dependents of the asbestos worker in the case of his or her death due to asbestosis, subject to the provisions of this division, if all of the following conditions occur:

(1) The asbestos worker demonstrates to the account that at the time of exposure, the asbestos worker was performing services and was acting within the scope of his or her duties in an occupation that subjected the asbestos worker to the exposure to asbestos.

(2) The asbestos worker demonstrates to the account that he or she is suffering from asbestosis.

(3) The asbestos worker demonstrates to the account that he or she developed asbestosis from the employment.

(4) The asbestos worker is entitled to compensation for asbestosis as otherwise provided for in this division.

(b) The findings of the account with regard to the conditions in subdivision (a) shall not be evidence in any other proceeding.

(c) The account shall require the asbestos worker to submit to an independent medical examination unless the information and assistance officer, in consultation with the medical director or his or her designee, determines that there exists adequate medical evidence that the worker developed asbestosis from the employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 4.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits [4407. - 4411.]

4407.

When the account determines that the conditions in Section 4406 have occurred, payments as advances on workers’ compensation asbestos workers’ benefits shall be provided in accordance with this chapter, notwithstanding the right of the asbestos worker to secure compensation as otherwise provided for in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 5.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4407.3.

For purposes of this chapter, the death benefit shall be paid in installments in the same manner and amounts as temporary disability indemnity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 6.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4407.5.

Benefits provided by this chapter shall not be commuted into a lump-sum payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 7.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4408.

Prior to seeking compensation benefits under this chapter, the asbestos worker shall first make claim on the employer or its workers’ compensation insurance carrier for payment of compensation under this division. If the asbestos worker is unable to locate the responsible employer or insurance carrier, or if the employer or insurance carrier fails to pay or denies liability for the compensation required by this division to the person entitled thereto, within a period of 30 days after the assertion of such a claim, the asbestos worker may seek payment of workers’ compensation asbestos workers’ benefits required by this division from the Asbestos Workers’ Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1077, Sec. 8.   Effective September 15, 1982.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4409.

The Director of Industrial Relations, or his or her representative, shall assign investigative and claims adjustment services respecting matters concerning Asbestos Workers’ Account cases. Those assignments may be made within the department, including the Division of Workers’ Compensation, and excluding the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1097, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4409.5.

The administrative director shall appoint workers’ compensation judges and support staff who shall give priority to the processing of the claims of asbestos workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 326, Sec. 12.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4410.

The administrative director shall appoint at least two information and assistance officers who shall give priority to assisting asbestos workers pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The information and assistance officer shall assist to the fullest extent possible any asbestos worker seeking benefits under this chapter. In assisting the asbestos worker, the information and assistance officer shall conduct necessary investigation and procure those records, reports, and information which are necessary to the early identification of responsible employers and insurance carriers, and to facilitate in the expediting of payments of benefits that may be due under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4411.

(a) When a claim is made against the Asbestos Workers’ Account, the account shall secure appropriate information, adjust the claim, and pay benefits provided by this chapter in accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) The asbestos worker shall, prior to the first payment of benefits by the Asbestos Workers’ Account, file an application before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board to determine the responsible employer for payment of compensation under this division.

(c) In every case before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board in which a claim of injury from exposure to asbestos is alleged, the appeals board shall join the Asbestos Workers’ Account as a party to the proceeding and serve the fund with copies of all decisions and orders, including findings and awards, and order approving compromise and release.

(d) Once a decision establishing the responsible employer or insurance carrier is agreed upon between the parties, or is issued by the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, and becomes final, the Asbestos Workers’ Account shall terminate payment of compensation benefits, notify all interested parties accordingly, and seek collection as provided for under this chapter. Responsibility for payment of all future compensation benefits shall be in accordance with such agreement, order, or decision.

(e) The account shall terminate the payment of benefits to any employee who fails to cooperate fully in determining the responsible employer or insurance carrier.

(f) The Asbestos Workers’ Account may, at any time, commence or join in proceedings before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board by filing an application on its own behalf. In any case in which the Asbestos Workers’ Account has been joined as a party or has filed an application on its own behalf, the Asbestos Workers’ Account shall have all of the rights and privileges of a party applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Collections [4412. - 4418.]

4412.

The Asbestos Workers’ Account shall take all reasonable and appropriate action to insure that recovery is made by the account for all moneys paid as compensation benefits and as costs.

In the event that the responsible employer is uninsured, the account shall not be entitled to reimbursement from the Uninsured Employers Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4413.

No limitation of time provided by this division shall run against the Asbestos Workers’ Account to initiate proceedings before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board when the account has made any payment of moneys, incurred any costs for services, or encumbered any liability of the account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 138.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4414.

Immediately following the receipt of knowledge of initiation of proceedings before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board, or any other jurisdiction providing benefits for the same injury, the Asbestos Workers’ Account shall file a lien and may invoke such other remedies as are available to recover moneys expended for compensation benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4415.

In any hearing or proceeding, the Director of Industrial Relations may use attorneys from within the department, or the Attorney General, to represent the director and the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4416.

Once an agreement as to the responsible employer is reached, or a decision is issued by the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board and becomes final, the Asbestos Workers’ Account shall notify the responsible employer or insurance carrier of the amount of payment necessary to satisfy the lien in full. Full payment of the lien shall be made by the responsible employer or insurance carrier within 30 days of the issue of such notification. The account may grant a reasonable extension of time for payment of the lien beyond 30 days. This payment shall be for all moneys expended for compensation benefits, and for all recoverable costs including the cost of independent medical examination and all costs reasonably incidental thereto, including, but not limited to, costs of transportation, hospitalization, consultative evaluation, X-rays, laboratory tests, and other diagnostic procedures. The payment shall bear interest, as provided in Section 5800, from the date of the agreement or decision through the date of payment.

The lien of the Asbestos Workers’ Account shall be allowed as a first lien against compensation, and shall have priority over all other liens. The lien of the Asbestos Workers’ Account may not be reduced by the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board or by the parties unless express written consent to the proposed reduction of the lien is given by the Asbestos Workers’ Account and is filed in the record of proceedings before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4417.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to preclude the filing by an asbestos worker of a claim or suit for damages or indemnity against any person other than his or her employer. The Asbestos Workers’ Account shall be entitled to recover from, and shall have a first lien against, any amount which is recoverable by the injured employee pursuant to civil judgment or settlement in relation to a claim for damages or indemnity for the effect of exposure to asbestos, for all compensation benefits paid to the injured employee by the Asbestos Workers’ Account which have not previously been recovered from the responsible employer or employers by the Asbestos Workers’ Account. Recovery by the Asbestos Workers’ Account pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not have the effect of extinguishing or diminishing the liability of the responsible employer or employers to the injured employee for compensation payable under the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1041.   Provisions inoperative January 1, 1989, as prescribed in Section 4418.)
-------------------------------------------

4418.

The provisions of this chapter providing for the payment of workers’ compensation asbestos workers’ benefits from the Asbestos Workers’ Account shall be operative only until January 1, 1989, and as of that date all payments from the fund shall be terminated, and the state shall have no further obligation to pay asbestos workers’ benefits, unless a later enacted statute which is chaptered before January 1, 1989, deletes or extends that date. However, if no statute is enacted to delete or extend that date prior to January 1, 1989, the authority of the Asbestos Workers’ Account under this chapter to recover the benefits and costs paid to asbestos workers prior to that date shall continue until the benefits and costs have been recovered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1156, Sec. 4.   Note: Termination provisions apply to Chapter 11, commencing with Section 4401.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. COMPUTATION OF COMPENSATION [4451. - 4856.]



  CHAPTER 1. Average Earnings [4451. - 4459.]

4451.

Average annual earnings shall be taken as fifty-two times the average weekly earnings referred to in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

4452.

Four times the average annual earnings shall be taken at not less than four thousand eight hundred dollars and sixty-four cents ($4,800.64) nor more than fifteen thousand two hundred dollars and sixty-four cents ($15,200.64) in disability cases, and in death cases shall be taken at not less than the minimum nor more than the maximum limits as provided in Section 4702 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

4452.5.

As used in this division:

(a) “Permanent total disability” means a permanent disability with a rating of 100 percent permanent disability only.

(b) “Permanent partial disability” means a permanent disability with a rating of less than 100 percent permanent disability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1023.)
-------------------------------------------

4453.

(a) In computing average annual earnings for the purposes of temporary disability indemnity and permanent total disability indemnity only, the average weekly earnings shall be taken at:

(1) Not less than one hundred twenty-six dollars ($126) nor more than two hundred ninety-four dollars ($294), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1983.

(2) Not less than one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) nor more than three hundred thirty-six dollars ($336), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1984.

(3) Not less than one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) for permanent total disability, and,
 for temporary disability, not less than the lesser of one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) or 1.5 times the employee’s average weekly earnings from all employers, but in no event less than one hundred forty-seven dollars ($147), nor more than three hundred ninety-nine dollars ($399), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1990.

(4) Not less than one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) for permanent total disability, and for temporary disability, not less than the lesser of one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189) or 1.5 times the employee’s average weekly earnings from all employers, nor more than five hundred four dollars ($504), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1991.

(5) Not less than one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) for permanent total disability, and for temporary disability, not less than the lesser of one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189) or 1.5
 times the employee’s average weekly earnings from all employers, nor more than six hundred nine dollars ($609), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994.

(6) Not less than one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) for permanent total disability, and for temporary disability, not less than the lesser of one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189) or 1.5 times the employee’s average weekly earnings from all employers, nor more than six hundred seventy-two dollars ($672), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1995.

(7) Not less than one hundred sixty-eight dollars ($168) for permanent total disability, and for temporary disability, not less than the lesser of one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189) or 1.5 times the employee’s average weekly earnings from all employers, nor more than seven hundred thirty-five dollars ($735), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1996.

(8) Not less than one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189), nor more than nine hundred three dollars ($903), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2003.

(9) Not less than one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189), nor more than one thousand ninety-two dollars ($1,092), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2004.

(10) Not less than one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189), nor more than one thousand two hundred sixty dollars ($1,260), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2005. For injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2006, average weekly earnings shall be taken at not less than one hundred eighty-nine dollars ($189), nor more than one thousand two hundred sixty dollars ($1,260) or 1.5 times the state average weekly wage, whichever is greater. Commencing on January 1, 2007, and each January 1
 thereafter, the limits specified in this paragraph shall be increased by an amount equal to the percentage increase in the state average weekly wage as compared to the prior year. For purposes of this paragraph, “state average weekly wage” means the average weekly wage paid by employers to employees covered by unemployment insurance as reported by the United States Department of Labor for California for the 12 months ending March 31 of the calendar year preceding the year in which the injury occurred.

(b) In computing average annual earnings for purposes of permanent partial disability indemnity, except as provided in Section 4659, the average weekly earnings shall be taken at:

(1) Not less than seventy-five dollars ($75), nor more than one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1983.

(2) Not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred ten dollars ($210), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1984.

(3) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating of the injured employee is 15 percent or greater, but not more than 24.75 percent: (A) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred twenty-two dollars ($222), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994; (B) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred thirty-one dollars ($231), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1995; (C) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred forty dollars ($240), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1996.

(4) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating of the injured employee is 25 percent or greater, not less than one hundred five
 dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred twenty-two dollars ($222), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 1991.

(5) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating of the injured employee is 25 percent or greater but not more than 69.75 percent: (A) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred thirty-seven dollars ($237), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994; (B) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred forty-six dollars ($246), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1995; and (C) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred fifty-five dollars ($255), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1996.

(6) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating of the injured employee is less than 70 percent: (A) not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), nor more than
 two hundred seventy-seven dollars and fifty cents ($277.50), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2003; (B) not less than one hundred fifty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($157.50), nor more than three hundred dollars ($300), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2004; (C) not less than one hundred fifty-seven dollars and fifty cents ($157.50), nor more than three hundred thirty dollars ($330), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2005; and (D) not less than one hundred ninety-five dollars ($195), nor more than three hundred forty-five dollars ($345), for injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2006.

(7) When the final adjusted permanent disability rating of the injured employee is 70 percent or greater, but less than 100 percent: (A) not less than one hundred five dollars ($105), nor more than two hundred fifty-two dollars ($252), for injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994; (B) not less than one hundred five